src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
"%{XC%}:k"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{XC%}:k <=> [%{kg%}:k | k: ] (HarmDummiesVar) _ ;

"%{cć%}:ć"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{cć%}:ć <=> _ (HarmDummiesVar) GRAD  %^PAL: ;
!Isaać

"%{cć%}:c"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{cć%}:c <=> _ (HarmDummiesVar) GRAD %^NoPAL: ;



!! ### Consonant weakening 

! aika: ajan
"kToZero"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
k:0 <=>
  [h|k|s] _ [Vow:|ArchVow:] (s) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^WGStem: ;
!!€ puhkas%{back%}%^WGStem%>taq
!!€ puh0as00%>taq

 s _ a (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^WGStem: ;
! [  #  Cns* Vow (( r | i | VowNonHigh ) k | t | h | l | r | s ) | Vow :Cns+ :Vow+ k ] _ [ GRC | %^D2S:0 i %> %^WCns:0 ] ;
![ [ # ] Cns* Vow (( r | i ) k | t | h | l | r | s ) | Vow :Cns+ :Vow+ k ] _ [ [Vow:|ArchVow:] | :Vow | ( Vow ) %> i ] ( %> i: | %^StretchSyll2:0 ) %> %^WCns:0 ;
!        [ # ] Cns* VowBack i: _ [ GRC | %^D2S:0 i %> %^WCns:0 ] ;
  k _ [(HarmDummiesVar)|[Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummiesVar) %^Pen:] [ %^CC2C:0 | %^WGStem: ] ;
  [h|s] _ [(HarmDummiesVar) VOWHite |[Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen:] %^WGStem:  ;
!!€ ikkõ%{back%}%^Pen%^CC2C%^VowRM%>m%{aä%}
!!€ ik000000%>ma

"%{pṕØ%}:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 %{pṕØ%}:0 <=>
 p _ (HarmDummiesVar) VOWHite  [%^WGStem: | %^G1: ] ;
 p _ (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen:  [%^WGStem: | %^G1: ] ;

"%{tt́Ø%}:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 %{tt́Ø%}:0 <=>
  [t|h] _ (HarmDummiesVar) VOWHite [%^WGStem: | %^G1: ] ;
  [t|h] _ (Vow:) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen: [%^WGStem: | %^G1: ] ;
  %{tØ%}: _ Vow: (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^G1: ;
!!€ võ{tØ}{tt́Ø}a^Pen^G1^Pen^NoPAL^VowRM>eti
!!€ võ00000000>eti

"%{kḱØ%}:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 %{kḱØ%}:0 <=>
 [k|h|s] _ (HarmDummiesVar) VOWHite [%^WGStem: | %^G1: ] ;
 [k|h|s] _ (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen: [%^WGStem: | %^G1: ] ;

!!juuskma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:
!!€ j{ou}{ou}s{kḱØ}{back}^VOWLower^WGStem>{eõ}
!!€ joos0000>õ
!!$ j{ou}{ou}s{kḱØ}{back}^VOWLower^WGStem>{eõ}
!!$ joosk000>õ

"%{sØ%}:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 %{sØ%}:0 <=>
 _ [s|ś|ArchCns:] [Vow:|ArchVow:] (Cns:|ArchCns:) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen:  [%^G1:|%^G2:|%^CC2C:|%^WGStem:] ;

!!€ su%{sØ%}śo%{back%}%^Pen%^WGStem
!!€ su0śo000
    _  [s|ś|ArchCns:] (HarmDummiesVar) VOWHite  [ %^CC2C:|%^WGStem:] ;
!! vaśma+V+Inf/mA: **answer/vastata**
!!€ va{sØ}{sś}{back}^VOWRaise^WGStem^PAL>m{aä}
!!€ va0ś0000>ma
!kraśma
    _  (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite (%^Pen:  %^G1:|%^Pen:  %^WGStem:|%^Pen: %^StrGStem: ) (%^VowRM:) %^WGStem: ;
!!hammas+N+Sg+Gen: __tooth/hammas__
!!€ ham%{bm%}a%{sØ%}%{back%}%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^WGStem
!!€ hamba0000000

!!rahvas+N+Pl+Gen: __nation/kansa__
!!€ rahva{sØ}{back}^VowRM^WGStem>id{eõ}
!!€ rahv00000>idõ

"%{vØ%}:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 %{vØ%}:0 <=>
 _ [v|v́|ArchCns:] [Vow:|ArchVow:] (Cns:|ArchCns:) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen:  [%^WGStem:|%^CC2C:] ;
    _  [v|v́|ArchCns:] (HarmDummiesVar) VOWHite  [ %^CC2C:|%^WGStem:] ;
!! kruv́ma+V+Inf/mA
!!€ kru{vØ}{vv́}{back}^VOWRaise^WGStem^PAL>m{aä}
!!€ kru0v́0000>ma


"%{rØ%}:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 %{rØ%}:0 <=>
 [Vow:|ArchVow:] _ (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite (%^Pen: %^G1: |%^Pen: %^WGStem:) (%^VowRM: ) %^WGStem: ;
  _ [r|ŕ | ArchCns: |%{rŕ%}:] (HarmDummiesVar) [PenVOWHite|VOWHite] [%^G1:|%^WGStem:] ;
!sekretäŕ
  _ [r|ŕ|%{rŕ%}:] [Vow:|ArchVow:] (ArchCns:|Cns:* |i:) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen: [ %^G1: | %^G2: |%^WGStem:] ;
!!€ a%{rØ%}ro%{back%}%^Pen%^G2
!!€ a0ro000
  _ [r|ŕ |%{rŕ%}:]  [[Vow:|ArchVow:] (Cns:* |i:) (%{hØ%}:|%{sØ%}: ) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen:|(HarmDummiesVar) ]  [%^G1:|%^WGStem:]  ;

 [Vow:|ArchVow:]  _ [ ArchCns: ]  [[Vow:|ArchVow:] (Cns:* |i:) (%{hØ%}:|%{sØ%}: ) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen:|(HarmDummiesVar) ]  [%^G1:|%^WGStem:]  ;


 [Vow:|ArchVow:] _ [r|ŕ |%{rŕ%}:] Vow (:Cns |:Vow) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen: [%^G1:|%^WGStem:] ;
  _ [r|ŕ|%{rŕ%}:] Vow: (Cns | ArchCns: ) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite  %^Pen: [%^G1:|%^WGStem:]  ;


"%{nØ%}:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 %{nØ%}:0 <=>  _ [n|ń|%{nń%}:] [Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen: [ %^G1: | %^G2: |%^WGStem:| %^CC2C: ] ;
!!€ su%{nØ%}ńo%{back%}%^Pen%^WGStem
!!€ su0ńo000
!!€ va{nØ}{nń}u{back}^Pen^VOWRaise^Pen^CC2C^Pen^NoPAL^VowRM>m{aä}
!!€ va0n000000000>m{aä}
 [Vow:|ArchVow:]  _ [n|ń |%{nń%}:]  [[Vow:|ArchVow:] (Cns:| ArchCns: |i:) (%{hØ%}:|%{sØ%}: ) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen:|(HarmDummiesVar) ]  [%^G1:  | %^G2: |%^WGStem:] ;
 [Vow:|ArchVow:]  _ [ ArchCns: ]  [[Vow:|ArchVow:] (Cns:| ArchCns: |i:) (%{hØ%}:|%{sØ%}: ) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen:|(HarmDummiesVar) ]  [ %^G1:  | %^G2: |%^WGStem:]  ;
 [Vow:|ArchVow:] _ (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite (%^Pen: %^G1: |%^Pen: %^WGStem:) (%^VowRM: ) %^WGStem: ;

 [Vow:|ArchVow:] _ [n|ń|%{nń%}: ] Vow (:Cns |:Vow) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen: [ %^G1:  | %^G2: |%^WGStem:] ;
  _ [n|ń | ArchCns: ] (HarmDummiesVar) VOWHite [%^G1:  | %^G2: |%^WGStem:] ;
!jońma
  _ [n|ń|%{nń%}:] Vow: (Cns | ArchCns: ) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen: [ %^G1:  | %^G2: |%^WGStem:]  ;


"%{lØ%}:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 %{lØ%}:0 <=>  _ [l|ĺ | %{lĺ%}: ] [Vow:|ArchVow:] (Cns:|ArchCns:) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen: [ %^G1: | %^G2: |%^WGStem:|%^CC2C:] ;
!!€ ta%{lØ%}lo%{back%}%^Pen%^WGStem
!!€ ta0lo000
 [Vow:|ArchVow:]  _ [l|ĺ | %{lĺ%}: ]  [[Vow:|ArchVow:] (Cns:* |i:) (%{hØ%}:|%{sØ%}: ) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen:|(HarmDummiesVar) (PenVOWHite|VOWHite) ]  [%^G1:|%^WGStem:|%^CC2C:]  ;
 [Vow:|ArchVow:]  _ [ ArchCns: ]  [[Vow:|ArchVow:] (Cns:* |i:) (%{hØ%}:|%{sØ%}: ) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen:|(HarmDummiesVar) ]  [%^G1:|%^WGStem:]  ;
 [Vow:|ArchVow:] _ (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite (%^Pen: %^G1:|%^Pen: %^WGStem: ) (%^VowRM: ) %^WGStem: ;

 [Vow:|ArchVow:] _ [l|ĺ | %{lĺ%}: ] Vow (:Cns |:Vow) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen: [%^G1:|%^WGStem:|%^CC2C:] ;
  _ [l|ĺ | %{lĺ%}: ] (HarmDummiesVar) [VOWHite|PenVOWHite] [%^G1:|%^WGStem:] ;
  _ [l|ĺ| %{lĺ%}: ] Vow: (Cns | ArchCns: ) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen: [%^G1:|%^WGStem:|%^CC2C:]  ;


"%{mØ%}:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 %{mØ%}:0 <=>  _ m [Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen: [ %^G1: | %^G2:|%^WGStem:|%^CC2C:] ;
!!€ su%{sØ%}śo%{back%}%^Pen%^WGStem
!!€ su0śo000
 [Vow:|ArchVow:]  _ [m|ḿ |ArchVow:]  [[Vow:|ArchVow:] (Cns:* |i:) (%{hØ%}:|%{sØ%}: ) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen:|(HarmDummiesVar) ]  [%^G1:|%^WGStem:|%^CC2C:]  ;
 [Vow:|ArchVow:]  _ [ ArchCns: ]  [[Vow:|ArchVow:] (Cns:* |i:) (%{hØ%}:|%{sØ%}: ) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen:|(HarmDummiesVar) ]  [%^G1:|%^WGStem:|%^CC2C:]  ;
 [Vow:|ArchVow:] _ (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite (%^Pen: %^G1:|%^Pen: %^WGStem: ) (%^VowRM: ) %^WGStem: ;

 [Vow:|ArchVow:] _ [m|ḿ|ArchCns: ] Vow (:Cns |:Vow) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen: [%^G1:|%^WGStem:|%^CC2C:] ;
  _ [m|ḿ | ArchCns: ] (HarmDummiesVar) VOWHite [%^G1:|%^WGStem:|%^CC2C:] ;
  _ [m|ḿ|ArchCns:] Vow: (Cns | ArchCns: ) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen: [%^G1:|%^WGStem:|%^CC2C:]  ;


"%{kØ%}:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 %{kØ%}:0 <=> [h|s] _ [Vow:|ArchVow:] (s|%{sØ%}:|ArchCns: ) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^WGStem: ;
!!€ puh%{kØ%}as%{back%}%^WGStem%>taq
!!€ puh0as00%>taq
!!€ vis%{kØ%}a%{back%}%^WGStem%>aq
!!€ vis0a00%>aq

 [s|h] _  (HarmDummiesVar) ( %^VOWLower:) %^WGStem: ;
!! nätsk+A+Sg+Gen
!!€ nä%{td%}s%{kØ%}%{front%}%^G1%>%{aä%}
!!€ näds000%>ä

!  k _ (HarmDummiesVar) VOWHite [ %^G1: | %^G2: ] ;
 s _ a (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen: [%^WGStem:] ;
 
   _ [k | ḱ | %{kḱ%}: ] (HarmDummiesVar) VOWHite [ %^CC2C:0 | %^WGStem: ] ;
   _ [ %{kḱ%}: | %{kḱg%}: ] (HarmDummiesVar) [ %^CC2C:0 | %^WGStem: |%^G3: |%^G2:] ;
   _ [k | ḱ | %{kḱ%}:] [Vow:|ArchVow:] ( %{sØ%}: ) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen: [ %^CC2C:0 | %^WGStem:] ;
   _ [ %{kḱ%}: ] [Vow:|ArchVow:] ( %{sØ%}: ) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen: [ %^CC2C:0 | %^WGStem: | %^G3: ] ;

   _ [ %{kg%}: ] (HarmDummiesVar) [%^G3:|%^G2:|%^CC2C:]  ;
!!€ eläni{kØ}{kg}{front}^G3
!!€ eläni0k00
  [h|s] _ [(HarmDummiesVar)|[Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummiesVar) %^Pen:] [%^WGStem:]  ;
!!€ i%{kØ%}kõ%{back%}%^Pen%^CC2C%^VowRM%>m%{aä%}
!!€ i0k00000%>ma

!! kakma:
!!€ ka%{kØ%}%{kḱ%}u%{back%}%^Pen%^CC2C%^VowRM%>m%{aä%}
!!€ ka0k00000%>ma
  _ %{kḱg%}: (HarmDummiesVar) [ %^CC2C: | %^G2: | %^G3: ] ;

!! kõiḱ+Pron+Sg+Nom
!!€ kõi%{kØ%}%{kḱg%}%{back%}%^CC2C%^PAL
!!€ kõi0ḱ000
 Vow  _ [ k | ḱ |ArchCns:] [Vow:|ArchVow:] (ArchCns:) (HarmDummiesVar) %^Pen:  [%^WGStem:|%^CC2C:]  ;
 Vow  _ [ %{kgØ%}: | %{kg%}: ] [Vow:|ArchVow:] (ArchCns:) (HarmDummiesVar) %^Pen: [%^G1: | %^G2: | %^G3: |%^CC2C:] ;
!!€ ri%{kØ%}ka%{sØ%}%{back%}%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem
!!€ ri0kas00000
 Vow  _  %{kgØ%}:  (HarmDummiesVar)  [%^G1: | %^G2: | %^G3: |%^CC2C:] ;
!! jõgi+N+Sg+Gen: **river/joki**
!!€ jõ%{kØ%}%{kgØ%}%{back%}%^G1%>%{eõ%}
!!€ jõ0000%>õ

_ %{kg%}: (HarmDummiesVar) [ %^G2: | %^G3: |%^CC2C:] ;

"pToZero"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 p:0 <=>
  p _ (HarmDummiesVar) [%^CC2C:0|%^WGStem:] ;
  p _ [Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummiesVar) %^Pen: [%^CC2C:0|%^WGStem:] ;
!!€ tapp%{back%}%^CC2C%>m%{aä%}
!!€ tap000%>ma

"%{pØ%}:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{pØ%}:0 <=>
  _ [Cns|%{pṕ%}:|%{pṕb%}:] (HarmDummiesVar) VOWHite [%^CC2C:0|%^WGStem:|%^G3: ] ;
!klaṕma
!!sepp+N+Sg+Gen
!!€ se%{pØ%}p%{front%}%^WGStem
!!€ se0p00

!  _ p (HarmDummiesVar) [%^CC2C:0|%^WGStem:| %^G1: | %^G2: | %^G3:] ;
  _ [p|%{pṕ%}:] [Vow:|ArchVow:] (Cns|%{ij%}:|%{sØ%}:|ArchCns:) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen: [ %^G3: | %^CC2C:0|%^WGStem:] ;!2019-11-05
!  _ p [Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummiesVar) %^Pen: [ %^G1: | %^G2: | %^G3: | %^CC2C:0|%^WGStem:] ;!2019-11-05
  p _ [Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen: [ %^G3: | %^CC2C:0] ;
!!€ tap%{pØ%}%{back%}%^CC2C%>m%{aä%}
!!€ tap000%>ma
Vow: _ [ %{pbØ%}: | %{pbv%}: ] Vow: (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen: [ %^G1: |%^G2: | %^G3: |%^CC2C:] ;
Vow: _  %{pbv%}: (HarmDummiesVar) [ %^G1: |%^G2: | %^G3: |%^CC2C:] ;


"XØToZero"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 Cx:0 <=>
 [Vow:|ArchVow:]  _ [Cy ]  [[Vow:|ArchVow:] (Cns:* |i:) (%{hØ%}:|%{sØ%}: ) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen:|(HarmDummiesVar) ] [ %^WGStem: | %^G1: ] ;
 [Vow:|ArchVow:]  _ [ ArchCns: ]  [[Vow:|ArchVow:] (Cns:* |i:) (%{hØ%}:|%{sØ%}: ) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen:|(HarmDummiesVar) ] [ %^WGStem: | %^G1: ] ;
 [Vow:|ArchVow:] _ (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite (%^Pen: %^G1:|%^Pen: %^WGStem: ) (%^VowRM: ) %^WGStem: ;
!! agras+A+Sg+Gen
!!€ a%{kg%}ra%{sØ%}%{back%}%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^G2%^WGStem
!!€ akra0000000
 [Vow:|ArchVow:] _ Cns [Vow|ArchVow:] (:Cns |:Vow|ArchCns:) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen: [%^G1:|%^WGStem:] ;
 Vow: _ (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite PenGRAD (%^VowRM:) %^WGStem:0 ;
  _ [Cy | ArchCns: ] (HarmDummiesVar) [%^G1: | PenVOWHite %^WGStem:] ;
  _ Cy Vow: (Cns | ArchCns: ) (HarmDummiesVar) %^Pen: [%^G1:|%^WGStem:]  ;
!!€ ve%{rØ%}rev%{front%}%^Pen%^WGStem%>%{aä%}
!!€ ve0rev000%>ä
         where Cx in (%{hØ%}) 
               Cy in (h     ) matched ;
!! elläi+N+Sg+Gen
!!€ e{lØ}lä{ij}{front}^Pen^WGStem^I2J>{aä}
!!€ e0läj0000>ä
!! pereh+N+Sg+Gen: **family/perhe**
!!€ pe{rØ}re{hØ}{front}^Pen^StrGStem^WGStem
!!€ perre00000
!! hamõh+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ ha%{mØ%}mõ%{hØ%}%{back%}%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^StrGStem
!!€ ha0mõh000000

"XØToSelf"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 Cx:Cy <=>
  _ Cy (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite [ %^G3: |%^G4: |%^StrGStem:] ;
  _ Cy [Vow:|ArchVow:] (Cns: | ArchCns: |%{ij%}:) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen: [%^G3:|%^G4: |%^StrGStem:]  ;
! Cy _ Vow: (Cns: | ArchCns: |%{ij%}:) (HarmDummiesVar) %^Pen: %^G2:  ;
     where Cx in (%{lØ%} %{mØ%} %{rØ%} %{vØ%}) 
     	   Cy in ( l       m      r      v) matched ;
!! villui+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ vi{lØ}lui{back}^Pen^G3
!!€ villui000


!! kevväi+N+Sg+Gen: **spring**
!!€ ke%{vØ%}vä%{ij%}%{front%}%^Pen%^WGStem%>ä
!!€ ke0väj000%>ä
